New York, session 2025-2026, S7466.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 128 to read as follows: 3 § 128. Ticketing gender options. 1. Notwithstanding any law, rule or 4 regulation to the contrary, no later than January first, two thousand 5 twenty-six, any entity doing business in this state and engaged in the 6 business of mass-transportation of the general public on an airplane, 7 railroad train, bus or cruise ship shall update its reservation, ticket- 8 ing and check-in website applications to include an additional gender 9 marker option to allow transgender, gender non-binary and gender non- 10 conforming travelers to select their gender based on self-attestation, 11 regardless of the sex assigned at birth. The additional gender option 12 may be specified as "Unspecified", "Undisclosed" or "X", or any combina- 13 tion thereof. 14 2. The provisions of this section shall not apply to: 15 a. any governmental entity; 16 b. any entity providing private transportation services; 17 c. any entity providing mass-transportation city bus services; or 18 d. any entity providing mass-transportation services to the general 19 public that do not require members of the public to make a reservation 20 or purchase a ticket in advance to utilize the transportation services. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08376-01-5